Ohio, session 136, HB664.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 4741.19 be amended and section 4741.191 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 4741.19. (A) Unless exempted under this chapter, no person shall practice veterinary medicine, or any of its branches, without a license or limited license issued by the state veterinary medical licensing board pursuant to sections 4741.11 to 4741.13 of the Revised Code, a temporary permit issued pursuant to section 4741.14 of the Revised Code, or a registration certificate issued pursuant to division (C) of this section, or with an inactive, expired, suspended, terminated, or revoked license, temporary permit, or registration. (B) No veterinary student shall: (1) Perform or assist surgery unless under direct veterinary supervision and unless the student has had the minimum education and experience prescribed by rule of the board; (2) Engage in any other work related to the practice of veterinary medicine unless under veterinary supervision; (3) Participate in the operation of a branch office, clinic, or allied establishment unless a licensed veterinarian is present on the establishment premises. (C) No person shall act as a registered veterinary technician unless the person is registered with the board on a biennial basis and pays the biennial registration fee. A registered veterinary technician registration expires biennially on the first day of March in the odd-numbered years and may be renewed in accordance with the standard renewal procedures contained in Chapter 4745. of the Revised Code upon payment of the biennial registration fee and fulfillment of ten continuing education hours during the two years immediately preceding renewal for registration. Each registered veterinary technician shall notify in writing the executive director of the board of any change in the registered veterinary technician's office address or employment within ninety days after the change has taken place. (1) A registered veterinary technician operating under veterinary supervision may perform the following duties: (a) Prepare or supervise the preparation of patients, instruments, equipment, and medications for surgery; (b) Collect or supervise the collection of specimens and perform laboratory procedures as required by the supervising veterinarian; (c) Apply wound dressings, casts, or splints as required by the supervising veterinarian; (d) Assist a veterinarian in immunologic, diagnostic, medical, and surgical procedures; (e) Suture skin incisions; (f) Administer or supervise the administration of topical, oral, or parenteral medication under the direction of the supervising veterinarian; (g) Dispense and administer, in accordance with a care coordination agreement, a vaccine, including a rabies vaccine, to a covered animal as provided under section 4741.191 of the Revised Code; (h) Other ancillary veterinary technician functions that are performed pursuant to the order and control and under the full responsibility of a licensed veterinarian. (h)(i) Any additional duties as established by the board in rule. (2) A registered veterinary technician operating under direct veterinary supervision may perform all of the following: (a) Induce and monitor general anesthesia according to medically recognized and appropriate methods; (b) Dental prophylaxis, periodontal care, and extraction not involving sectioning of teeth or resection of bone or both of these; (c) Equine dental procedures, including the floating of molars, premolars, and canine teeth; removal of deciduous teeth; and the extraction of first premolars or wolf teeth. The degree of supervision by a licensed veterinarian over the functions performed by the registered veterinary technician shall be consistent with the standards of generally accepted veterinary medical practices. (3) The board shall issue a registration to be a veterinary technician in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an applicant if either of the following applies: (a) The applicant holds a similar registration or license in another state. (b) The applicant has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as a veterinary technician in a state that does not issue that registration or license. (D)(D)(1) A veterinarian licensed to practice in this state shall not present the person's self as or state a claim that the person is a specialist unless the veterinarian has previously met the requirements for certification by a specialty organization recognized by the American board of veterinary specialties for a specialty or such other requirements set by rule of the board and has paid the fee required by division (A)(10) of section 4741.17 of the Revised Code. The board shall issue a certification as a veterinary specialist in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an applicant if the applicant holds a certification as a specialist in another state or has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as a veterinary specialist in a state that does not issue that certification. (2) No person shall use the title "registered veterinary technician" or the title "veterinary technician," the abbreviation "R.V.T.," or any other words, letters, or symbols, with the intent to represent that the person is authorized to act as a registered veterinary technician, unless that person is registered with the board as required by this section and such registration is not suspended or revoked. (E) Notwithstanding division (A) of this section, any animal owner or the owner's designee may engage in the practice of embryo transfer on the owner's animal if a licensed veterinarian directly supervises the owner or the owner's designee and the means used to perform the embryo transfer are nonsurgical. (F) Allied medical support may assist a licensed veterinarian to the extent to which the law that governs the individual providing the support permits, if all of the following apply: (1) A valid veterinary-client-patient-relationship veterinary-client-patient relationship exists. (2) The individual acts under direct veterinary supervision. (3) The allied medical support individual receives informed, written, client consent. (4) The veterinarian maintains responsibility for the patient and keeps the patient's medical records. The board may inspect the facilities of an allied medical support individual in connection with an investigation based on a complaint received in accordance with section 4741.26 of the Revised Code involving that individual. Sec. 4741.191. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Covered animal" means a shelter dog or a shelter cat. (2) "Dog" means any member of the species Canis familiaris. (3) "Cat" means any member of the species Felis catus. (4) "Antiparasitic medication" means medication dispensed and administered, in accordance with a care coordination agreement, to a covered animal for the purpose of controlling apparent or anticipated internal or external parasites. (B) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a licensed veterinarian may, consistent with any federal law requirements or restrictions and subject to the conditions described in this section, authorize a registered veterinary technician to establish an assess and treat relationship in accordance with a care coordination agreement on behalf of the veterinarian for either or both of the following purposes: (1) To allow the registered veterinary technician to dispense and administer, in accordance with a care coordination agreement, vaccines, including the rabies vaccine, to a covered animal; (2) To allow the registered veterinary technician to dispense and administer, in accordance with a care coordination agreement, antiparasitic medication to a covered animal. (C) A registered veterinary technician dispensing and administering, in accordance with a care coordination agreement, such vaccines or antiparasitic medications under division (B) of this section is subject to veterinary supervision, and the requirement for such supervision may be met by a veterinarian who is readily available to communicate with the registered veterinary technician via telephonic means at all times during the dispensation and administration. (D) Prior to authorizing a registered veterinary technician to establish an assess and treat relationship on behalf of a veterinarian as authorized under this section, the veterinarian shall establish a care coordination agreement describing the duties the registered veterinary technician must perform prior to and during the dispensation and administration of any vaccine or antiparasitic medication. The agreement shall include provisions regarding each of the following: (1) Obtaining from the covered animal's owner or caretaker the animal's available medical history; (2) Requirements for examination of the covered animal prior to dispensation and administration of a vaccine or antiparasitic medication; (3) Criteria, including any information in the covered animal's history or physical examination, that would disqualify the covered animal from receiving a vaccine or antiparasitic medication; (4) Vaccination protocols for each covered animal species for which vaccines are dispensed and administered that include, at a minimum, handling, dispensing, and administering of vaccines, when not to dispense or administer such vaccines, and what to do in the event of an adverse reaction or other emergency. Such protocols shall not authorize the registered veterinary technician to prescribe the vaccines, but only to dispense and administer such vaccines. (5) Protocols for parasite treatment and control for each covered animal species for which antiparasitic medications are being dispensed and administered, which shall include, at a minimum, handling, dispensing, and administering of medications, when not to dispense and administer such medications, and what to do in the event of an adverse reaction or other emergency. Such protocols shall not authorize the registered veterinary technician to prescribe the antiparasitic medications, but only to dispense and administer such antiparasitic medications. (6) Requirements that a veterinarian be available to physically respond in the event of an adverse reaction or other emergency and protocols for contacting that veterinarian to obtain such assistance in those events; (7) Documentation of any additional education and training provided by the veterinarian to the registered veterinary technician in order for the registered veterinary technician to perform all of the agreed upon duties within the care coordination agreement; (8) Documentation of all the following information: (a) The name or initials of the registered veterinary technician who establishes an assess and treat relationship on behalf of the veterinarian; (b) The name, address, and telephone number of the client; (c) The name or identity of the covered animal; (d) The age, sex, breed, species, and color of the covered animal; (e) The medical history information as it pertains to each covered animal; (f) Any physical examination findings; (g) Any assessment completed before dispensing or administering a vaccine or other medication; (h) Client consent for recommended vaccines or antiparasitic medications; (i) All medications and treatments, including strength, dosage, and route of administration; (j) Record of relevant client communication, including whether an evaluation by a veterinarian or follow-up care was recommended. (9) Any other information, protocols, and restrictions that the veterinarian determines are necessary and appropriate for the care coordination agreement. (E) If a veterinarian authorizes a registered veterinary technician to establish an assess and treat relationship on behalf of the veterinarian, the veterinarian and the registered veterinary technician shall sign and date both of the following within the care coordination agreement: (1) A statement containing the authorization for the registered veterinary technician to act on behalf of the veterinarian and to establish the assess and treat relationship for the limited purposes of dispensing and administering, in accordance with the care coordination agreement, vaccines and antiparasitic medication when acting in compliance with the protocols, conditions, and procedures specified in this section and within the care coordination agreement. The authorization remains in effect until the date the veterinarian terminates the authorization for the registered veterinary technician to act on behalf of the veterinarian. (2) A statement containing an assumption of risk by the veterinarian for all acts of the registered veterinary technician related to examining the covered animal and dispensing and administering, in accordance with the care coordination agreement, vaccines or antiparasitic medication, except that the assumption of risk by the veterinarian does not apply to willful acts of animal cruelty, gross negligence, or gross unprofessional conduct on behalf of the registered veterinary technician. (F) Before a registered veterinary technician examines or dispenses or administers, in accordance with a care coordination agreement, any vaccines or antiparasitic medication to a covered animal in accordance with this section, the client shall be informed orally or in writing that the registered veterinary technician is acting on behalf of a licensed veterinarian. The client also shall be provided with the veterinarian's name and license number. The registered veterinary technician or a person authorized by the supervising veterinarian shall obtain permission from the client for the registered veterinary technician to proceed with examining the covered animal and dispensing or administering, in accordance with a care coordination agreement, any vaccine or medication after such disclosure. The registered veterinary technician or a person authorized by the supervising veterinarian shall document in the covered animal's medical record the oral or written authorization of the client to proceed with the registered veterinary technician's examination of the animal and dispensation or administration, in accordance with the care coordination agreement, of the specified vaccine or medication. (G) Documentation relating to the satisfaction of the conditions listed in divisions (E) and (F) of this section shall be retained by the veterinarian for a minimum of three years. Section 2. That existing section 4741.19 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.